Hawaii statutes.
§240-2 Books, papers, etc. All
books, papers, records, and accounts of such person shall at all reasonable
times be open to inspection by the director of finance of such county, or the
director's agents appointed for such purpose. [L 1937, c 105, pt of §1; RL
1945, pt of §5681; RL 1955, §131-2; HRS §240-2; gen ch 1985]

Revision Note

Reference to director of finance substituted for treasurer to
conform to county charters.

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next